bg-BG: Съвместим капацитет на местата: 1-местен; 2-местен; 3-местен; 4-местен; 5-местен; 6-местен; Лежанка; По поръчка; Двуместен диван; Секционен/модулен; Друг
it: Capacità di posti a sedere compatibile: 1 posto; 2 posti; 3 posti; 4 posti; 5 posti; 6 posti; Chaise-longue; Personalizzato; Divanetto; Componibile/Modulare; Altro
fr: Nombre de places compatible: 1 place; 2 places; 3 places; 4 places; 5 places; 6 places; Méridienne; Personnalisé; Canapé 2 places; Sectionnel/modulable; Autre
ru: Совместимая вместимость сидений: 1-местный; 2-местный; 3-местный; 4-местный; 5-местный; 6-местный; Оттоманка; Индивидуальный; Двухместный диван; Секционный/модульный; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilan kapacitet sjedenja: Jednosjed; Dvosjed; Trosjed; Četverosjed; Peterosjed; Šesterosjed; Počivaljka; Po narudžbi; Loveseat (mali dvosjed); Kutna / modularna garnitura; Ostalo
cs: Kompatibilní kapacita počtu míst k sezení: 1místné; 2místné; 3místné; 4místné; 5místné; 6místné; Lenouška; Vlastní; Pohovka pro dva; Sekční/modulární; Jiné
sl-SI: Združljiva sedežna kapaciteta: 1-sed; 2-sed; 3-sed; 4-sed; 5-sed; 6-sed; Počivalnik; Po meri; Dvosed; Kotna garnitura/modularno; Drugo
zh-TW: 相容座位數: 1 人座; 2 人座; 3 人座; 4 人座; 5 人座; 6 人座; 貴妃椅; 自訂; 雙人座; 組合式/模組化; 其他
en: Compatible seating capacity: 1-seater; 2-seater; 3-seater; 4-seater; 5-seater; 6-seater; Chaise; Custom; Loveseat; Sectional/Modular; Other
ro-RO: Capacitate de locuri compatibilă: 1 loc; 2 locuri; 3 locuri; 4 locuri; 5 locuri; 6 locuri; Șezlong (Chaise); Personalizat; Canapea cu două locuri (Loveseat); Secțională/modulară; Altele
th: จำนวนที่นั่งในรถยนต์ที่รองรับการใช้งาน: 1 ที่นั่ง; 2 ที่นั่ง; 3 ที่นั่ง; 4 ที่นั่ง; 5 ที่นั่ง; 6 ที่นั่ง; เชส; กำหนดเอง; เลิฟซีท; แบบแยกส่วน/ถอดประกอบได้; อื่นๆ
ko: 호환 좌석 수: 1인용; 2인용; 3인용; 4인용; 5인용; 6인용; 셰즈; 맞춤형; 러브시트; 섹셔널/모듈러; 기타
nl: Compatibele zitcapaciteit: 1-zitter; 2-zitter; 3-zitter; 4-zitter; 5-zitter; 6-zitter; Chaise longue; Aangepast; Loveseat; Modulair; Overige
pt-PT: Capacidade de assentos compatível: 1 lugar; 2 lugares; 3 lugares; 4 lugares; 5 lugares; 6 lugares; Chaise longue; Personalizado; Sofá de dois lugares; Seccional/modular; Outra
hu: Kompatibilis ülőhelyek száma: 1 személyes; 2 személyes; 3 személyes; 4 személyes; 5 személyes; 6 személyes; Dívány; Egyedi; Kétszemélyes kanapé; Szekcionált/moduláris; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel sittekapasitet: 1-seter; 2-seter; 3-seter; 4-seter; 5-seter; 6-seter; Sjeselong; Tilpasset; Toseter; Seksjon/modulær; Annet
pl: Kompatybilna liczba miejsc siedzących: 1 miejsce; 2 miejsca; 3 miejsca; 4 miejsca; 5 miejsc; 6 miejsc; Szezlong; Niestandardowe; Sofa dwuosobowa (loveseat); Narożnik/modułowe; Inne
sv: Kompatibel säteskapacitet: 1-sitsig; 2-sitsig; 3-sitsig; 4-sitsig; 5-sitsig; 6-sitsig; Schäslong; Anpassad; Tvåsitssoffa; Modul/sektion; Övrigt
pt-BR: Capacidade de assentos compatível: 1 lugar; 2 lugares; 3 lugares; 4 lugares; 5 lugares; 6 lugares; Chaise; Personalizado; Namoradeira; Seccional/Modular; Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva istumapaikkamäärä: 1-paikkainen; 2-paikkainen; 3-paikkainen; 4-paikkainen; 5-paikkainen; 6-paikkainen; Divaani; Mukautettu; Kahdenistuttava; Modulaarinen; Muu
sk-SK: Kompatibilná usadzovacia kapacita: 1-miestne; 2-miestne; 3-miestne; 4-miestne; 5-miestne; 6-miestne; Leňoška; Vlastné; Dvojsedačka; Sektorové/modulárne; Iné
vi: Sức chứa chỗ ngồi tương thích: 1 chỗ ngồi; 2 chỗ ngồi; 3 chỗ ngồi; 4 chỗ ngồi; 5 chỗ ngồi; 6 chỗ ngồi; Ghế dài (Chaise); Tùy chỉnh; Ghế đôi (Loveseat); Ghế ghép/Mô-đun; Khác
el: Συμβατή χωρητικότητα καθισμάτων: Μονοθέσιο; Διθέσιο; Τριθέσιο; Τετραθέσιο; Πενταθέσιο; Εξαθέσιο; Ανάκλιντρο; Προσαρμοσμένο; Διθέσιος καναπές; Πολυμορφικό/αρθρωτό; Άλλο
de: Kompatible Sitzplatzkapazität: 1-Sitzer; 2-Sitzer; 3-Sitzer; 4-Sitzer; 5-Sitzer; 6-Sitzer; Chaiselongue; Maßanfertigung; Loveseat; Mehrteilig/modular; Sonstige
es: Capacidad de asientos compatible: 1 asiento; 2 asientos; 3 asientos; 4 asientos; 5 asientos; 6 asientos; Chaise longue; Personalizado; Sofá de dos plazas; Seccional/modular; Otro
da: Kompatibelt antal pladser: 1-personers; 2-personers; 3-personers; 4-personers; 5-personers; 6-personers; Chaiselong; Tilpasset; Topersoners sofa; Modulsofa; Andet
tr: Uyumlu koltuk kapasitesi: 1 kişilik; 2 kişilik; 3 kişilik; 4 kişilik; 5 kişilik; 6 kişilik; Şezlong; Özel; İkili koltuk; Seksiyonel/modüler; Diğer
ja: 互換性のある座席数: 1人掛け; 2人掛け; 3人掛け; 4人掛け; 5人掛け; 6人掛け; カウチ; カスタム; ラブシート; セクショナル/モジュラー; その他
zh-CN: 可容纳的乘坐人数: 1 座; 2 座; 3 座; 4 座; 5 座; 6 座; 贵妃椅; 定制; 双人沙发; 组合式/模块化; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas sėdimų vietų skaičius: 1 vietos; 2 vietų; 3 vietų; 4 vietų; 5 vietų; 6 vietų; Kušetė; Pasirinktinis; Dvivietė sofa; Segmentinė / modulinė; Kita